Delaware, session 153, SB144.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Subchapter V, Chapter 70, Title 25 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 7041. Delaware Manufactured Home Relocation Authority [For application of this section, see 79 Del. Laws, c. 304, Â§â7].Â (c) The Board shall do all of the following: (3) Authorize payments and adjust, eliminate, or reinstate the Trust Fund assessment established under Â§ 7042 of this title only if With the affirmative vote of at least 3 of the 5 members of the Board approve the payments or assessments. Board, authorize any of the following regarding the Trust Fund under Â§ 7042 of this title: a. Payments. b. Adjust, eliminate, or reinstate the Trust Fund assessment. c. Adjust, eliminate, or reinstate the cap on the Trust Fund. Â§ 7042. Delaware Manufactured Home Relocation Trust Fund [Expires July 1, 2029, pursuant to subsection (d) of this section]. (e) The DMHRA Board may establish and adjust the cap on the Trust Fund is $15 million. The cap may be adjusted, eliminated, or reinstated by the Board at any time, subject to the voting requirements under Â§ 7041(c)(3) of this title. based on the costs reasonably necessary to carry out the purposes of the Trust Fund under subsection (b) of this section.